Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4715
Missing child; department and probation; duties.

The department and probation shall establish procedures for the immediate dissemination of a current picture and information about a child who is missing from a foster care or out-of-home placement to appropriate third parties, which may include law enforcement agencies or persons engaged in procuring, gathering, writing, editing, or disseminating news or other information to the public. Any information released to a third party under this section shall be subject to state and federal confidentiality laws and shall not include that the child is under the care, custody, or supervision of the department or under the supervision of probation. Such dissemination by probation shall be authorized by an order of a judge or court.

Laws 2017, LB225, § 15.